parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-countries.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     country names
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# CREATED:	04-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop 
+Continent
+Country

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# CONTINENTS
!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
África+Prop+Continent	FSG;
América+Prop+Continent	FSG;
Asia+Prop+Continent	FSG;
Europa+Prop+Continent	FSG;
Oceanía+Prop+Continent	FSG;

!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# COUNTRIES
!# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------


Afganistán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Albania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Alemania% Federal+Prop+Country		FSG;
Alemania% Occidental+Prop+Country	FSG;
Alemania% Oriental+Prop+Country		FSG;
Alemania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Alto% Volta+Prop+Country		MSG;
Andorra+Prop+Country			FSG;
Angola+Prop+Country			FSG;
Antigua% y% Barbuda+Prop+Country	FPL;
Antillas% Neerlandesas+Prop+Country	FPL;
Arabia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Arabia% Saudí+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Arabia% Saudita+Prop+Country		FSG;
Argelia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Argentina+Prop+Country			FSG;
Armenia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Australia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Austria+Prop+Country			FSG;
Azerbaiyán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bahamas+Prop+Country			FPL;
Bahrain+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Bahrein+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bahréin+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Bangladesh+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bangla% Desh+Prop+Country		XSG;
Barbados+Prop+Country			MPL;
Belarús+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bélgica+Prop+Country			FSG;
Belice+Prop+Country			MSG;
Belize+Prop+Country			MSG;
Benin+Prop+Country			MSG;
Benín+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bhután+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bielorrusia+Prop+Country		FSG;
Birmania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Bolivia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Borneo+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bosnia% Herzegovina+Prop+Country	FSG;
Bosnia-Herzegovina+Prop+Country		FSG;
Bosnia% y% Hercegovina+Prop+Country	FPL;
Botswana+Prop+Country			FSG;
Brasil+Prop+Country			MSG;
Brunei% Darussalam+Prop+Country		MSG;	!@
Brunei+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bulgaria+Prop+Country			FSG;
BRD+Prop+Country+Acron			FSG;	!=Bundesrepublik Deutschland
Burkina% Faso+Prop+Country		XSG;
Burquina% Faso+Prop+Country		XSG;
Burundi+Prop+Country			MSG;
Bután+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Cabo% Verde+Prop+Country		MSG;
Cabo% Verde+Prop+Country		MSG;	!@
Caicos% Islands+Prop+Country		FPL;
Camboya+Prop+Country			FSG;
Camerún+Prop+Country			MSG;
Canadá+Prop+Country			MSG;
Ceilán+Prop+Country			MSG;
CSR+Prop+Country+Acron			FSG;	!=Cesko-Slovenská Republika
Chad+Prop+Country			MSG;
Checoslovaquia+Prop+Country		FSG;
Chile+Prop+Country			MSG;
China+Prop+Country			FSG;	!@
Chipre+Prop+Country			MSG;
Ciudad% del% Vaticano+Prop+Country	FSG;
Colombia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Comoras+Prop+Country			FPL;
Comores+Prop+Country			FPL;	!@
Comunidad% de% Estados% Independientes+Prop+Country	FSG;
Congo+Prop+Country			MSG;
Corea% del% Norte+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Corea% del% Sur+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Corea+Prop+Country			FSG;
Costa% de% Marfil+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Costa% Rica+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Croacia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Cuba+Prop+Country			FSG;
DDR+Prop+Country+Acron			FSG;	!=Deutsche Demokratische Republik
Dinamarca+Prop+Country	 		FSG;
Djibouti+Prop+Country			MSG;
Dominica+Prop+Country			FSG;
Ecuador+Prop+Country			MSG;
EE% UU+Prop+Country			MPL;
EE.UU.+Prop+Country			MPL;
E.U.+Prop+Country			MPL;
Egipto+Prop+Country			MSG;
Emiratos% Árabes% Unidos+Prop+Country	MPL;	!@
Eritrea+Prop+Country			FSG;
Escocia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Eslovaquia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Eslovenia+Prop+Country			FSG;
España+Prop+Country			FSG;
Estados% Federados% de% Micronesia+Prop+Country	MPL;
Estados% Unidos% de% América+Prop+Country	MPL;
Estados% Unidos% de% México+Prop+Country	MPL;
Estados% Unidos+Prop+Country		MPL;
Estonia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Etiopía+Prop+Country			FSG;
Federación% Malaya+Prop+Country		FSG;
Federación% Rusa+Prop+Country		FSG;
Fidji+Prop+Country			MSG;
Filipinas+Prop+Country			FPL;
Finlandia+Prop+Country			FSG;
France+Prop+Country			FSG;
Francia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Gabón+Prop+Country			MSG;
Gambia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Georgia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Ghana+Prop+Country			FSG;
Granada+Prop+Country			FSG;	!@
Gran% Bretaña+Prop+Country		FSG;
Grecia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Guadualupe+Prop+Country			FSG;
Guatemala+Prop+Country			FSG;
Guayana+Prop+Country			FSG;	!@
Guinea-Bissau+Prop+Country		FSG;
Guinea% Ecuatorial+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Guinea+Prop+Country			FSG;
Guyana+Prop+Country			FSG;
Haití+Prop+Country			MSG;
Holanda+Prop+Country			FSG;
Honduras+Prop+Country			FSG;
Hong% Kong+Prop+Country			XSG;
Hungría+Prop+Country			FSG;
India+Prop+Country			FSG;
Indonesia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Inglaterra+Prop+Country			FSG;
Irak+Prop+Country			MSG;
Irán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Iraq+Prop+Country			MSG;
Irlanda% del% Norte+Prop+Country	FSG;
Irlanda+Prop+Country			FSG;
Isla% de% San% Vicente+Prop+Country	FSG;	!@
Islandia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Islas% Fiji+Prop+Country		FPL;	!@
Islas% Marshall+Prop+Country		FPL;	!@
Islas% Salomón+Prop+Country		FPL;	!@
Israel+Prop+Country			MSG;
Italia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Jamaica+Prop+Country			FSG;
Japón+Prop+Country			MSG;
Jordania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Kazajistán+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Kazajstán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Kenia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Kenya+Prop+Country			FSG;
Kirguistán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Kiribati+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Kurzijistán+Prop+Country		MSG;	!@
Kuwait+Prop+Country			MSG;
Laos+Prop+Country			MSG;
Lesotho+Prop+Country			MSG;
Letonia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Líbano+Prop+Country			MSG;
Liberia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Libia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Liechtenstein+Prop+Country		MSG;
Lituania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Luxemburgo+Prop+Country			MSG;
Macedonia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Madagascar+Prop+Country			MSG;
Madegascar+Prop+Country			MSG;
Malasia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Malawi+Prop+Country			MSG;
Maldivas+Prop+Country			FPL;	!@
Malí+Prop+Country			MSG;
Malta+Prop+Country			FSG;
Marruecos+Prop+Country			MSG;
Mauricio+Prop+Country			MSG;
Mauritania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Méjico+Prop+Country			MSG;
México+Prop+Country			MSG;
Mianma+Prop+Country			FSG;
Micronesia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Moldavia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Mónaco+Prop+Country			MSG;
Mongolia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Mozambique+Prop+Country			MSG;
Namibia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Nauru+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Nepal+Prop+Country			MSG;
Nicaragua+Prop+Country			FSG;
Nigeria+Prop+Country			FSG;
Níger+Prop+Country			MSG;
Noruega+Prop+Country			FSG;
Nueva% Zelanda+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Omán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Países% Bajos+Prop+Country		MPL;
Pakistán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Palau+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Palestina+Prop+Country			FSG;
Panamá+Prop+Country			MSG;
Papúa% Nueva% Guinea+Prop+Country	FSG;	!@
Papúa-Nueva% Guinea+Prop+Country	XSG;
Paquistán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Paraguay+Prop+Country			MSG;
Persia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Perú+Prop+Country			MSG;
Polonia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Portugal+Prop+Country			MSG;
Qatar+Prop+Country			MSG;
Reino% Unido% de% Gran% Bretaña% e% Irlanda% del% Norte+Prop+Country	MSG;
Reino% Unído+Prop+Country		MSG;	!@
República% Arabe% de% Egipto+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Arabe% Unida+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Centroafricana+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Checa+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
República% China+Prop+Country		FSG;
República% de% Corea+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% del% África% Central+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
República% del% Yemen+Prop+Country	FSG;
RDA+Prop+Country+Acron			FSG;	!=República Democrática Alemana
República% Democrática% Alemana+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Democrática% del% Congo+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
República% de% Sudáfrica+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Dominicana+Prop+Country	FSG;	!@
República% Eslovaca+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Fedéral% Checa% y% Eslovaca+Prop+Country	FSG;
RFA+Prop+Country+Acron	      		FSG;	!=República Federal de Alemania
República% Federal% de% Alemania+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Popular% China+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Popular% de% China+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Popular% Democrática% de% Corea+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Sudafricana+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Unida% de% Tanganyika% y% Zanzíbar+Prop+Country	FSG;
República% Unida% de% Tanzania+Prop+Country	FSG;
Ruanda+Prop+Country			FSG;
Rumania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Rumanía+Prop+Country			FSG;	!@
Rusia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Rwanda+Prop+Country			FSG;
Sabah+Prop+Country			XSG;
Sáhara+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Salvador+Prop+Country			MSG;
Samoa+Prop+Country			FSG;
San% Cristóbal% y% Nevis+Prop+Country	MSG;
San% Marino+Prop+Country		MSG;
Santa% Lucía+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Santo% Tomé% y% Príncipe+Prop+Country	MSG;
Santo% Tomé% y% Príncipe+Prop+Country	MSG;	!@
San% Vicente+Prop+Country		MSG;
San% Vicente% y% las% Granadinas+Prop+Country	MSG;
Sarawak+Prop+Country			FSG;
Senegal+Prop+Country			MSG;
Seychelles+Prop+Country			FPL;
Sierra% Leona+Prop+Country		FSG;	!@
Singapur+Prop+Country			MSG;
Siria+Prop+Country			FSG;
Somalia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Sri% Lanka+Prop+Country			XSG;
Sudáfrica+Prop+Country			FSG;	!@
Sudán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Suecia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Suiza+Prop+Country			FSG;
Suráfrica+Prop+Country			FSG;	!@
Suriname+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Surinam+Prop+Country			MSG;
Swazilandia+Prop+Country		FSG;
Swaziland+Prop+Country			XSG;
Tailandia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Taiwan+Prop+Country			MSG;
Taiwán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Tajikistán+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Tanganyika+Prop+Country			FSG;
Tanzania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Tayikistán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Thailandia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Togo+Prop+Country			MSG;
Tonga+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Trinidad% Tobago+Prop+Country		FSG;
Trinidad% y% Tobago+Prop+Country	FSG;	!@
Túnez+Prop+Country			MSG;
Tunicia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Turkmenistán+Prop+Country		MSG;
Turks% Islands+Prop+Country		FPL;
Turquía+Prop+Country			FSG;
Tuvalu+Prop+Country			MSG;	!@
Ucrania+Prop+Country			FSG;
Uganda+Prop+Country			FSG;
Urss+Prop+Country+Acron			FPL;	!=Unión de Repúblicas Socialistas Soviéticas
URSS+Prop+Country+Acron			FPL;	!=Unión de Repúblicas Socialistas Soviéticas
Unión% de% Repúblicas% Socialistas% Soviéticas+Prop+Country	FSG;
Unión% Sovietica+Prop+Country	    	FSG;
USA+Prop+Country+Acron			FPL;	!=United States of America
Uruguay+Prop+Country			MSG;
Uzbekistán+Prop+Country			MSG;
Vanuatu+Prop+Country			MSG;
Venezuela+Prop+Country			FSG;
Vietnam+Prop+Country			MSG;
Viet% Nam+Prop+Country			MSG;
Yemen+Prop+Country			MSG;
Yugoeslavia+Prop+Country		FSG;
Yugoslavia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Zaire+Prop+Country			MSG;
Zambia+Prop+Country			FSG;
Zanzíbar+Prop+Country			MSG;
Zimbabwe+Prop+Country			MSG;
